New York, session 2025-2026, S1163.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 2 284 to read as follows: 3 § 284. Rent minimums prohibited. No mortgagor on a loan secured prima- 4 rily by an interest in real property shall be charged a fee, forced to 5 default, or otherwise penalized by the mortgagee because the mortgagor 6 did not set a high enough rent on all or part of such real property. 7 All terms of a mortgage which would cause a mortgagor to be penalized 8 for not setting a high enough rent shall be void and unenforceable as 9 against public policy. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 11 mortgages regardless of when issued, renewed, modified, altered or 12 amended. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00490-01-5